California statutes. Civil Code
(b) (1) If management determines, in good faith, that the removal of a homeowner’s or resident’s personal property from the land and premises upon which the mobilehome is situated is necessary to bring the premises into compliance with the reasonable rules and regulations of the park or the provisions of the Mobilehome Parks Act (Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code) or Title 25 of the California Code of Regulations, management may remove the property to a reasonably secure storage facility. Management shall provide written notice of at least 14 days of its intent to remove the personal property, including a description of the property to be removed. The notice shall include the rule, regulation, or code justifying the removal and
 shall provide an estimate of the charges to be imposed by management. The property to be removed shall not include the mobilehome or its appurtenances or accessory structures.

(2) The homeowner or resident shall be responsible for reimbursing to management the actual, reasonable costs, if any, of removing and storing the property. These costs incurred by management in correcting the rules violation associated with the removal and storage of the property, are deemed reasonable incidental service charges and may be collected pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 798.56 if a notice of nonpayment of the removal and storage fees, as described in paragraph (3), is personally served on the homeowner.

(3) Within seven days from the date the property is removed to a storage area, management shall provide the homeowner or resident a written notice that includes an inventory of the property
 removed, the location where the property may be claimed, and notice that the cost of removal and storage shall be paid by the resident or homeowner. If, within 60 days, the homeowner or resident does not claim the property, the property shall be deemed to be abandoned, and management may dispose of the property in any manner. The homeowner’s or resident’s liability for storage charges shall not exceed 60 days. If the homeowner or resident claims the property, but has not reimbursed management for storage costs, management may bill those costs in a monthly statement which shall constitute notice of nonpayment, and the costs shall become the obligation of the homeowner or resident. If a resident or homeowner communicates in writing his or her intent to abandon the property before 60 days has expired, management may dispose of the property immediately and no further storage charges shall accrue.

(4) If management elects to dispose of the property
 by way of sale or auction, and the funds received from the sale or auction exceed the amount owed to management, management shall refund the difference to the homeowner or resident within 15 days from the date of management’s receipt of the funds from the sale or auction. The refund shall be delivered to the homeowner or resident by first-class mail postage prepaid to his or her address in the park, or by personal delivery, and shall include an accounting specifying the costs of removal and storage of the property incurred by management in correcting the rules violation and the amount of proceeds realized from any sale or auction. If a sale or auction of the property yields less than the costs incurred by management, the homeowner or resident shall be responsible for the difference, and this amount shall be deemed a reasonable incidental service charge and may be collected pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 798.56 if a notice of nonpayment of the removal and storage fees, as described in paragraph (3),
 is personally served on the homeowner. If management elects to proceed under this section, it may not also terminate the tenancy pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 798.56 based upon the specific violations relied upon to proceed under this section. In any proceeding under this section, management shall bear the burden of proof that enforcement was undertaken in a nondiscriminatory, nonselective fashion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

798.37.

A homeowner may not be charged a fee for the entry, installation, hookup, or landscaping as a condition of tenancy except for an actual fee or cost imposed by a local governmental ordinance or requirement directly related to the occupancy of the specific site upon which the mobilehome is located and not incurred as a portion of the development of the mobilehome park as a whole. However, reasonable landscaping and maintenance requirements may be included in the park rules and regulations. The management may not require a homeowner or prospective homeowner
 to purchase, rent, or lease goods or services for landscaping, remodeling, or maintenance from any person, company, or corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 302, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

798.37.5.

(a) With respect to trees on rental spaces in a mobilehome park, park management shall be solely responsible for the trimming, pruning, or removal of any tree, and the costs thereof, upon written notice by a homeowner or a determination by park management that the tree poses a specific hazard or health and safety violation. In the case of a dispute over that assertion, the park management or a
 homeowner may request an inspection by the Department of Housing and Community Development or a local agency responsible for the enforcement of the Mobilehome Parks Act (Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code) in order to determine whether a violation of that act exists.

(b) With respect to trees in the common areas of a mobilehome park, park management shall be solely responsible for the trimming, pruning, or removal of any tree, and the costs thereof.

(c) Park management shall be solely responsible for the maintenance, repair, replacement, paving, sealing, and the expenses related to the maintenance of all driveways installed by park management including, but not limited to, repair of root damage to driveways and foundation systems and removal. Homeowners shall be responsible for the maintenance, repair, replacement, paving,
 sealing, and the expenses related to the maintenance of a homeowner installed driveway. A homeowner may be charged for the cost of any damage to the driveway caused by an act of the homeowner or a breach of the homeowner’s responsibilities under the rules and regulations so long as those rules and regulations are not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

(d) No homeowner may plant a tree within the mobilehome park without first obtaining written permission from the management.

(e) This section shall not apply to alter the terms of any rental agreement in effect prior to January 1, 2001, between the park management and the homeowner regarding the responsibility for the maintenance of trees and driveways within the mobilehome park, except that upon any renewal or extension, the rental agreement shall be subject to this section. This section is not intended to abrogate
 the content of any existing rental agreement or other written agreements regarding trees or driveways that are in effect prior to January 1, 2001.

(f) This section shall only apply to rental agreements entered into, renewed, or extended on or after January 1, 2001.

(g) Any mobilehome park rule or regulation shall be in compliance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 298, Sec. 1.   (AB 2753)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

798.38.

The management shall not acquire a lien or security interest, other than an interest arising by reason of process issued to enforce a judgment of any court, in a mobilehome located in the park unless it is mutually agreed upon by both the homeowner and management. Any billing and payment upon the obligation shall be kept separate from current rent.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 798.40 by Stats. 2009, Ch. 558, Sec. 5.   (SB 111)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

798.39.

(a) The management may only demand a security deposit on or before initial occupancy and the security deposit may not be in an amount or value in excess of an amount equal to two months’ rent that is charged at the inception of the occupancy, in addition to any rent for the first month. In no event shall additional security deposits be demanded of a homeowner following the initial occupancy.

(b) As to all security deposits collected on or after January 1, 1989, after the
 homeowner has promptly paid to the management, within five days of the date the amount is due, all of the rent, utilities, and reasonable service charges for any 12-consecutive-month period subsequent to the collection of the security deposit by the management, or upon resale of the mobilehome, whichever occurs earlier, the management shall, upon the receipt of a written request from the homeowner, refund to the homeowner the amount of the security deposit within 30 days following the end of the 12-consecutive-month period of the prompt payment or the date of the resale of the mobilehome.

(c) As to all security deposits collected prior to January 1, 1989, upon the extension or renewal of the rental agreement or lease between the homeowner and the management, and upon the receipt of a written request from the homeowner, if the homeowner has promptly paid to the management, within five days of the date the amount is due, all of the rent,
 utilities, and reasonable service charges for the 12-consecutive-month period preceding the receipt of the written request, the management shall refund to the homeowner the amount of the security deposit within 60 days.

(d) As to all security deposits collected prior to January 1, 1989, and not disbursed pursuant to subdivision (c), in the event that the mobilehome park is sold or transferred to any other party or entity, the selling park owner shall deposit in escrow an amount equal to all security deposits that the park owner holds. The seller’s escrow instructions shall direct that, upon close of escrow, the security deposits therein that were held by the selling park owner (including the period in escrow) for 12 months or more, shall be disbursed to the persons who paid the deposits to the selling park owner and promptly paid, within five days of the date the amount is due, all rent, utilities, and reasonable service charges for the
 12-month period preceding the close of escrow.

(e) Any and all security deposits in escrow that were held by the selling park owner that are not required to be disbursed pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) shall be disbursed to the successors in interest to the selling or transferring park owner, who shall have the same obligations of the park’s management and ownership specified in this section with respect to security deposits. The disbursal may be made in escrow by a debit against the selling park owner and a credit to the successors in interest to the selling park owner.

(f) The management shall not be required to place any security deposit collected in an interest-bearing account or to provide a homeowner with any interest on the security deposit collected.

(g) Nothing in this section shall affect the
 validity of title to real property transferred in violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 151, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

798.39.5.

(a) (1) The management shall not charge or impose upon a homeowner any fee or increase in rent which reflects the cost to the management of any fine, forfeiture, penalty, money damages, or fee assessed or awarded by a court of law or an enforcement agency against the management for a violation of this chapter or Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the
 Health and Safety Code, including any attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the management in connection therewith.

(2) This section shall not apply to violations for which the registered owner of the mobilehome is initially responsible pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 18420 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) A court shall consider the remoteness in time of the assessment or award against the management of any fine, forfeiture, penalty, money damages, or fee in determining whether the homeowner has met the burden of proof that the fee or increase in rent is in violation of this section.

(c) Any provision in a rental agreement entered into, renewed, or modified on or after January 1, 1995, that permits a fee or increase in rent that reflects the cost to the management of any money damages awarded against the
 management for a violation of this chapter shall be void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 477, Sec. 2.   (AB 1938)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Utilities [798.40. - 798.44.2.]

798.40.

(a) Where management provides both master-meter and submeter service of utilities to a homeowner, for each billing period the cost of the charges for the period shall be separately stated along with the opening and closing readings for the homeowner’s meter. Management shall post, in a conspicuous place, the specific current residential utility rate schedule as published by the serving utility or the internet website address of the specific current residential utility rate schedule. If management elects to post the internet website address where the schedule may be accessed, management shall do both of the following:

(1) Provide a copy of the specific current residential utility rate schedule, upon request, at no cost.

(2) State in the posting that a homeowner may request a copy of the rate schedule from management.

(b) If a third-party billing agent or company prepares utility billing for the park, management shall disclose on each resident’s billing, the name, address, and telephone number of the billing agent or company.

(c) Whenever management elects to separately bill water service to a homeowner as a utility service pursuant to Section 798.41, and to provide submetered water service to homeowners as a master-meter customer of the water purveyor, as a part of the regular bill for water service, management shall only bill a homeowner for the following water service:

(1) A charge for volumetric usage, which may be calculated in any of the following ways:

(A) The amount shall be calculated by first determining the proportion of the homeowner’s usage, as shown by the submeter, to the total usage as shown by the water purveyor’s billing. The dollar amount billed to the homeowner for usage shall be in that same proportion to the dollar amount for usage shown by the water purveyor’s billing.

(B) If the water purveyor charges for volumetric usage based on a tiered rate schedule, management may calculate the charge for a homeowner’s volumetric usage as described in subparagraph (A) or management may instead divide each tier’s volume evenly among the number of mobilehome spaces, and the rate applicable to each block shall be applied to the consumption recorded for each mobilehome space.

(C) If the water purveyor charges the property rates on a per-mobilehome-space basis, the
 homeowners may be charged at those exact per-mobilehome-space rates.

(D) In no event shall the charge for volumetric usage under this paragraph include in its calculation water used by or for any common area facility in the park, or water used by any other person or entity, other than the homeowner being billed.

(2) Any recurring fixed charge, however that charge may be designated, for water service billed to the property by the water purveyors that, at management’s discretion, shall be calculated by either of the following:

(A) The homeowner’s proportion of the total fixed charges charged to management for the park’s water use. The homeowner’s proportion shall be based on the percentage of the homeowner’s volumetric water use in relation to the total volumetric water use of the entire park, as shown on management’s
 water bill during that period.

(B) Dividing the total fixed charges charged to the park equally among the total number of spaces at the park.

(3) A billing, administrative, or other fee representing the combined total of management’s and the billing agent’s costs, which shall be the lesser of an amount not to exceed four dollars and seventy-five cents ($4.75), as adjusted pursuant to this paragraph, or 25 percent of the amount billed pursuant to paragraph (1). Beginning January 1, 2022, the maximum fee authorized by this paragraph may be adjusted each calendar year by management, no higher than a commensurate increase in the Consumer Price Index based on a California fiscal year average for the previous fiscal year, for all urban consumers, as determined by the Department of Finance.

(d) For the purposes of this
 section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Billing agent” means a person or entity that contracts to provide submetering services to management, including billing.

(2) “Submeter” means a device that measures water consumption of an individual mobilehome space within a park, and that is owned and operated by management.

(3) “Water service” includes any charges, whether presented for payment on local water purveyor bills, tax bills, or bills from other entities, related to water treatment, distribution, or usage, including, but not limited to, water, sewer, stormwater, and flood control.

(4) “Water purveyor” means a water purveyor as defined in Section 512 of the Water Code.

(e) Nothing
 in this section shall be construed to prevent management from recovering its costs to install, maintain, or improve its internal water delivery system, as may otherwise be allowed in any rental agreement or local regulation.

(f) The provisions of subdivision (c) shall apply to all management that elects to separately bill water service to a homeowner as a utility service pursuant to Section 798.41, and to provide submetered water service to homeowners as a master-meter customer of the water purveyor, as a part of the regular bill for water service, including where the water purveyor or the mobilehome park is subject to the jurisdiction, control, or regulation of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 807, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

798.41.

(a) Where a rental agreement, including a rental agreement specified in Section 798.17, does not specifically provide otherwise, the park management may elect to bill a homeowner separately for utility service fees and charges assessed by the utility for services provided to or for spaces in the park. Any separately billed utility fees and charges shall not be deemed to be included in the rent charged for those spaces under the rental agreement, and shall not be deemed to be rent or a rent increase for purposes of any ordinance, rule,
 regulation, or initiative measure adopted or enforced by any local governmental entity which establishes a maximum amount that a landlord may charge a tenant for rent, provided that at the time of the initial separate billing of any utility fees and charges the rent chargeable under the rental agreement or the base rent chargeable under the terms of a local rent control provision is simultaneously reduced by an amount equal to the fees and charges separately billed. The amount of this reduction shall be equal to the average amount charged to the park management for that utility service for that space during the 12 months immediately preceding notice of the commencement of the separate billing for that utility service.

Utility services to which this section applies are natural gas or liquid propane gas, electricity, water, cable television, garbage or refuse service, and sewer service.

(b) This section
 does not apply to rental agreements entered into prior to January 1, 1991, until extended or renewed on or after that date.

(c) Nothing in this section shall require rental agreements to provide for separate billing to homeowners of fees and charges specified in subdivision (a).

(d) Those fees and charges specified in subdivision (a) shall be separately stated on any monthly or other periodic billing to the homeowner. If the fee or charge has a limited duration or is amortized for a specified period, the expiration date shall be stated on the initial notice and each subsequent billing to the homeowner while the fee or charge is billed to the homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 338, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

798.42.

(a) The management shall provide all affected homeowners and residents at least 72 hours’ written advance notice of an interruption in utility service of more than two hours for the maintenance, repair, or replacement of facilities of utility systems over which the management has control within the park, provided that the interruption is not due to an emergency. The management shall be liable only for actual damages sustained by a homeowner or resident for violation of this section.

(b) (1) Upon voluntary, written consent of a homeowner or resident, the management
 may provide notice under this section by electronic communication in a form of electronic communication to which the homeowner or resident consents.

(2) For each homeowner or resident not provided notice by electronic communication, the management shall post written notice on the mobilehome of the affected homeowner or resident.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Electronic communication” means email, text, or automated telephone call.

(2) “Emergency” means the interruption of utility service resulting from an accident or act of nature, or cessation of service caused by other than the management’s regular or planned maintenance, repair, or replacement of utility facilities.

(3) “Voluntary, written consent” means written consent obtained separately from, and not contained in, any lease or rental agreement. Voluntary consent may be revoked by the homeowner or resident in writing at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   (AB 661)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

798.43.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), whenever a homeowner is responsible for payment of gas, water, or electric utility service, management shall disclose to the homeowner any condition by which a gas, water, or electric meter on the homeowner’s site measures gas, water, or electric service for common area facilities or equipment, including lighting, provided that management has knowledge of the condition.

Management shall disclose this information prior to the inception of the tenancy
 or upon discovery and shall complete either of the following:

(1) Enter into a mutual written agreement with the homeowner for compensation by management for the cost of the portion of the service measured by the homeowner’s meter for the common area facilities or equipment to the extent that this cost accrues on or after January 1, 1991. 

(2) Discontinue using the meter on the homeowner’s site for the utility service to the common area facilities and equipment.

(b) On and after January 1, 1994, if the electric meter on the homeowner’s site measures electricity for lighting mandated by Section 18602 of the Health and Safety Code and this lighting provides lighting for the homeowner’s site, management shall be required to comply with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

798.43.1.

(a) The management of a master-meter park shall give written notice to homeowners and residents on or before February 1 of each year in their utility billing statements about assistance to low-income persons for utility costs available under the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) program, established pursuant to Section 739.1 of the Public Utilities Code. The notice shall include CARE information available to master-meter customers from their serving utility, to include, at a minimum: (1) the fact that CARE offers a discount
 on monthly gas or electric bills for qualifying low-income residents; and (2) the telephone number of the serving utility which provides CARE information and applications. The park shall also post the notice in a conspicuous place in the clubhouse, or if there is no clubhouse, in a conspicuous public place in the park.

(b) The management of a master-meter park may accept and help process CARE program applications from homeowners and residents in the park, fill in the necessary account or other park information required by the serving utility to process the applications, and send the applications to the serving utility. The management shall not deny a homeowner or resident who chooses to submit a CARE application to the utility himself or herself any park information, including a utility account number, the serving utility requires to process a homeowner or resident CARE program application.

(c) The management of a master-meter park shall pass through the full amount of the CARE program discount in monthly utility billings to homeowners and residents who have qualified for the CARE rate schedule, as defined in the serving utility’s applicable rate schedule. The management shall notice the discount on the billing statement of any homeowner or resident who has qualified for the CARE rate schedule as either the itemized amount of the discount or a notation on the statement that the homeowner or resident is receiving the CARE discount on the electric bill, the gas bill, or both the electric and gas bills.

(d) “Master-meter park” as used in this section means “master-meter customer” as used in Section 739.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 437, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

798.44.

(a) The management of a park that does not permit mobilehome owners or park residents to purchase liquefied petroleum gas for use in the mobilehome park from someone other than the mobilehome park management shall not sell liquefied petroleum gas to mobilehome owners and residents within the park at a cost which exceeds 110 percent of the actual price paid by the management of the park for liquefied
 petroleum gas.

(b) The management of a park shall post in a visible location the actual price paid by management for liquefied petroleum gas sold pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall apply only to mobilehome parks regulated under the Mobilehome Residency Law. This section shall not apply to recreational vehicle parks, as defined in Section 18215 of the Health and Safety Code, which exclusively serve recreational vehicles, as defined in Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) Nothing in this section is intended to abrogate any rights a mobilehome park owner may have under Section 798.31 of the Civil Code.

(e) In addition to a mobilehome park described in subdivision (a), the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) shall apply to
 a mobilehome park where requirements of federal, state, or local law or regulation, including, but not limited to, requirements for setbacks between mobilehomes, prohibit homeowners or residents from installing their own liquefied petroleum gas supply tanks, notwithstanding that the management of the mobilehome park permits mobilehome owners and park residents to buy their own liquefied petroleum gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 558, Sec. 7.   (SB 111)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

798.44.1.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any rental agreement or other instrument affecting the tenancy of a homeowner or resident in a mobilehome park that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation or use of a solar energy system on the mobilehome or the site, lot, or space on which the mobilehome is located is void and unenforceable.

(b) Management shall not prohibit or restrict a homeowner or resident from installing or using a solar energy system on a mobilehome or the site, lot, or space on which the mobilehome is located. Management shall not do any of the following:

(1) Charge
 any fee to a homeowner or resident in connection with the installation or use of a solar energy system.

(2) Require a homeowner or resident to use a specific solar installation contractor or solar energy system or product.

(3) Claim or receive any rebate, credit, or commission in connection with a homeowner’s or resident’s installation or use of a solar energy system.

(c) This section does not apply to imposition of reasonable restrictions on solar energy systems. However, it is the policy of the state to promote and encourage the use of solar energy systems and to remove obstacles thereto. Accordingly, reasonable restrictions on a solar energy system are those restrictions that do not significantly increase the cost of the
 system or significantly decrease its efficiency or specified performance, or that allow for an alternative system of comparable cost, efficiency, and energy conservation benefits.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “solar energy system” has the same meaning as defined in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 801.5.

(2) A solar energy system shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by state and local permitting authorities, consistent with Section 65850.5 of the Government Code.

(3) Solar energy systems and solar collectors used for heating water shall be certified by an accredited listing agency as defined in the California Plumbing and
 Mechanical Codes.

(4) A solar energy system for producing electricity shall also meet all applicable safety and performance standards established by the California Electrical Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers, and accredited testing laboratories such as Underwriters Laboratories and, if applicable, rules of the Public Utilities Commission regarding safety and reliability.

(e) This section shall not apply to a master-meter park. “Master-meter park” as used in this section means “master-meter customer” as used in Section 739.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 162, Sec. 1.   (SB 1190)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

798.44.2.

(a) Any covenant, restriction, or condition contained in any rental agreement or other instrument affecting the tenancy of a homeowner or resident in a mobilehome park that effectively prohibits or restricts the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system in a mobilehome is void and unenforceable.

 (b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), management shall not prohibit or restrict a homeowner or resident from installing, upgrading, replacing, or using a cooling system in their mobilehome. Management shall not do any of the following:

(A) Charge any fee to a homeowner or resident in
 connection with the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system.

(B) Require a homeowner or resident to use a specific cooling system, type of cooling system, or cooling system contractor or product.

(C) Claim or receive any rebate, credit, or commission in connection with a homeowner’s or resident’s installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system.

(D) Require homeowners or residents to remove cooling systems or prevent replacements or upgrades to existing cooling systems.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if management establishes
 any of the following:

(A) The installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of the cooling system would violate federal, state, or local law.

(B) A permit from a designated permitting authority is required for the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of the cooling system, and that permit is not granted.

(C) The amperage required to power any individual
 cooling
 system cannot be accommodated by the power service to the lot, as demonstrated in writing by a federal, state, or local governmental enforcement authority.

(c) For purposes of this section, “cooling system” may include, but is not limited to, a portable air-conditioning unit, a window air-conditioning unit, a swamp cooler or any evaporative cooler, a cooling fan system, a heat pump, or any other technology that reasonably creates an internal temperature cooling benefit. A cooling system shall meet applicable health and safety standards and requirements imposed by law.

(d) The tenancy of a homeowner or resident shall not be terminated for the installation, upgrade, replacement, or use of a cooling system as permitted under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   (AB 806)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Rent Control [798.45. - 798.49.]

798.45.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 798.17, “new construction,” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 798.7, shall be exempt from any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted by any city, county, or city and county, that establishes a maximum amount that a landlord may charge a tenant for rent, for a period of 15 years from the date upon which the space is initially held out for rent, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 798.7.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 798.17, “new mobilehome park construction,” as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 798.7, shall be exempt from any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure adopted by any city, county, or city and county, that establishes a maximum amount that a
 landlord may charge a tenant for rent for a period of 15 years from the date upon which 50 percent of the spaces in the new mobilehome park are initially held out for rent measured from the date of issuance of a permit or certificate of occupancy for that space by the enforcement agency in accordance with Section 18551 or 18613 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 666, Sec. 2.   (SB 940)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

798.49.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), the local agency of any city, including a charter city, county, or city and county, which administers an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that management may charge a tenant for rent shall permit the management to separately charge a homeowner for any of the following:

(1) The amount of any fee, assessment or other charge first imposed by a city, including a charter city, a county, a city and county, the state, or the federal government on or after January 1, 1995, upon the space rented by the homeowner.

(2) The amount of any increase on or after January 1, 1995, in an existing fee, assessment or other charge imposed by any governmental entity upon the space rented by the homeowner.

(3) The amount of any fee, assessment or other charge upon the space first imposed or increased on or after January 1, 1993, pursuant to any state or locally mandated program relating to housing contained in the Health and Safety Code.

(b) If management has charged the homeowner for a fee, assessment, or other charge specified in subdivision
 (a) that was increased or first imposed on or after January 1, 1993, and the fee, assessment, or other charge is decreased or eliminated thereafter, the charge to the homeowner shall be decreased or eliminated accordingly.

(c) The amount of the fee, assessment or other charges authorized by subdivision (a) shall be separately stated on any billing to the homeowner. Any change in the amount of the fee, assessment, or other charges that are separately billed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be considered when determining any rental adjustment under the local ordinance.

(d) This section shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Those fees, assessments, or charges imposed pursuant to the Mobilehome Parks Act (Part 2.1 (commencing with Section 18200) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code), unless specifically
 authorized by Section 18502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Those costs that are imposed on management by a court pursuant to Section 798.39.5.

(3) Any fee or other exaction imposed upon management for the specific purpose of defraying the cost of administration of any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that management may charge a tenant for rent.

(4) Any tax imposed upon the property by a city, including a charter city, county, or city and county.

(e) Those fees and charges specified in subdivision (a) shall be separately stated on any monthly or other periodic billing to the homeowner. If the fee or charge has a limited duration or is amortized for a specified period, the expiration date shall be
 stated on the initial notice and each subsequent billing to the homeowner while the fee or charge is billed to the homeowner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 770, Sec. 1.   (AB 2697)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Homeowner Communications and Meetings [798.50. - 798.52.]

798.50.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to ensure that homeowners and residents of mobilehome parks have the right to peacefully assemble and freely communicate with one another and with others with respect to mobilehome living or for social or educational purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 198, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

798.51.

(a) No provision contained in any mobilehome park rental agreement, rule, or regulation shall deny or prohibit the right of any homeowner or resident in the park to do any of the following:

(1) Peacefully assemble or meet in the park, at reasonable hours and in a reasonable manner, for any lawful purpose. Meetings may be held in the park community or recreation hall or clubhouse when the facility is not otherwise in use, and, with the consent of the homeowner, in any
 mobilehome within the park.

(2) Invite public officials, candidates for public office, or representatives of mobilehome owner organizations to meet with homeowners and residents and speak upon matters of public interest, in accordance with Section 798.50.

(3) Canvass and petition homeowners and residents for noncommercial purposes relating to mobilehome living, election to public office, or the initiative, referendum, or recall processes, at reasonable hours and in a reasonable manner, including the distribution or circulation of information.

(b) A homeowner or resident may not be charged a cleaning deposit in order to use the park recreation hall or clubhouse for meetings of resident organizations for any of the purposes stated in Section 798.50 and this section, whether or not guests or visitors from outside the
 park are invited to attend the meeting, if a homeowner or resident of the park is hosting the meeting and all homeowners or residents of the park are allowed to attend.
